Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8279.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 45-53 of the General Laws entitled "Low and Moderate Income
Housing" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
45-53-17. Smithfield emergency moratorium.
(a) If the town of Smithfield, shall at any time have an aggregate of two hundred fifty (250)
or more units proposed in a comprehensive permit project or projects, the town of Smithfield may
enact an emergency moratorium and not accept or process further applications. No application
proposed, offered, submitted or tendered during any moratorium imposed pursuant to the
provisions of this section shall have any grandfathered status.
(b) The town of Smithfield, upon adoption of any moratorium in accordance with the
provisions of subsection (a) of this section, may continue to impose the moratorium until such time
as comprehensive permit requirements in § 45-53-4 are amended.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005950
========